Massachusetts, session 194th, H3752.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general provisions or special laws to the contrary, there shall be a
special commission to recommend strategies to improve the land usage of the transportation
corridors of the Commonwealth for decreasing noise, light, and air pollution as well as
maximizing carbon sequestration and energy generation. The commission shall consist of the
chief of the office of climate innovation and resilience, the secretary of transportation, and the
secretary of energy and environmental affairs , who shall serve as the co-chairs, the
Massachusetts Department of Transportation highway administrator, or their designee; the
Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority general manager, or their designee; the
commissioner of the department of conservation and recreation, or their designee; 3 individuals
appointed by the governor; provided, 1 shall be a specialist in the field of transportation
of 2

maintenance and operations, 1 shall be a specialist in the field of transportation related pollutants
and 1 shall be a resident of a designated environmental justice community abutting a
transportation corridor; the president of the senate, or their designee; the speaker of the house, or
their designee; the senate and house chairs of the joint committee on transportation, or their
respective designees; the senate and house chairs of the joint committee on the environment,
natural resources and agriculture, or their respective designees; the senate and house minority
leaders, or their respective designees. The commission shall make a comprehensive study of
utilizing transportation right of ways to provide natural solutions to reduce transportation related
pollutants and increase carbon sequestration as well as for low carbon energy generation. The
commission shall review each agencies maintenance and design practices. The study shall also
include a financial analysis that includes up front construction costs as well as long term
maintenance costs of the implementation of new natural solutions compared to current practices.
The commission shall report to the joint committee on transportation, the joint committee on the
environment, natural resources and agriculture and the house and senate committees on ways and
means, the finding and recommendations, if any, together with drafts of legislation necessary to
carry the recommendations into effect by filing the same with the clerks of the senate and house
of representatives on or before December 31, 2026.
of 2